California statutes. Insurance Code
(c) An “Own Risk and Solvency Assessment” or “ORSA” means a confidential internal assessment that is appropriate to the nature, scale, and complexity of an insurer or insurance group, conducted by that insurer or insurance group, of the material and relevant risks associated with the insurer’s or insurance group’s current business plan and the sufficiency of capital resources to support those risks.

(d) The term “ORSA Guidance Manual” means the current version of the Own Risk and Solvency Assessment Guidance Manual developed and adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners (NAIC) and as amended from time to time. A change in the ORSA Guidance Manual shall be effective on the January 1 following the calendar year in which the changes have been adopted by the NAIC.

(e) An “ORSA Summary Report” means a confidential high-level summary of an insurer’s or
 insurance group’s ORSA.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 238, Sec. 1.   (AB 584)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2015, pursuant to Section 935.11.)
-------------------------------------------

935.3.

An insurer shall maintain a risk management framework to assist the insurer with identifying, assessing, monitoring, managing, and reporting on its material and relevant risks. This requirement may be satisfied if the insurance group of which the insurer is a member maintains a risk management framework applicable to the operations of the insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 238, Sec. 1.   (AB 584)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2015, pursuant to Section 935.11.)
-------------------------------------------

935.4.

Subject to Section 935.6, an insurer, or the insurance group of which the insurer is a member, shall regularly conduct an ORSA consistent with a process comparable to the ORSA Guidance Manual. The ORSA shall be conducted no less than annually but also at any time when there are significant changes to the risk profile of the insurer or the insurance group of which the insurer is a member.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 238, Sec. 1.   (AB 584)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2015, pursuant to Section 935.11.)
-------------------------------------------

935.5.

(a) Upon the commissioner’s request, and no more than once each year, an insurer shall submit to the commissioner an ORSA Summary Report or any combination of reports that together contain the information described in the ORSA Guidance Manual, applicable to the insurer or the insurance group of which it is a member. Notwithstanding any request from the commissioner, if the insurer is a member of an insurance group, the insurer shall submit the report or reports required by this subdivision only if the commissioner is the lead state commissioner of the insurance group as determined by the procedures within the Financial Analysis Handbook adopted by the NAIC.

(b) The report shall include a signature of
 the insurer’s or insurance group’s chief risk officer or other executive having responsibility for the oversight of the insurer’s enterprise risk management process, attesting to the best of his or her belief and knowledge that the insurer applies the enterprise risk management process described in the ORSA Summary Report and that a copy of the report has been provided to the insurer’s board of directors or the appropriate committee thereof.

(c) An insurer may comply with subdivision (a) by providing the most recent and substantially similar report provided by the insurer, or by another member of an insurance group of which the insurer is a member, to the commissioner of another state, or to a supervisor or regulator of a foreign jurisdiction, provided that the report provides information that is comparable to the information described in the ORSA Guidance Manual. A report in a language other than English shall be accompanied by a translation
 of that report into the English language.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 238, Sec. 1.   (AB 584)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2015, pursuant to Section 935.11.)
-------------------------------------------

935.6.

(a) An insurer shall be exempt from the requirements of this article if both of the following apply:

(1) The insurer has annual direct written and unaffiliated assumed premiums, including international direct and assumed premiums, but excluding premiums reinsured with the Federal Crop Insurance Corporation and Federal Flood Program, less than five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000).

(2) The insurance group of which the insurer is a member has annual direct written and unaffiliated assumed premiums, including international direct and assumed premiums, but excluding premiums reinsured with the Federal Crop Insurance Corporation and
 Federal Flood Program, less than one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000).

(b) If an insurer qualifies for exemption pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), but the insurance group of which the insurer is a member does not qualify for exemption pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), then the ORSA Summary Report that may be required pursuant to Section 935.5 shall include every insurer within the insurance group. This requirement may be satisfied by the submission of more than one ORSA Summary Report for any combination of insurers provided any combination of reports includes every insurer within the insurance group.

(c) If an insurer does not qualify for exemption pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), but the insurance group of which it is a member qualifies for exemption pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the only ORSA Summary Report that may be
 required pursuant to Section 935.5 shall be the report applicable to that insurer.

(d) An insurer that does not qualify for exemption pursuant to subdivision (a) may apply to the commissioner for a waiver from the requirements of this article based upon unique circumstances. In deciding whether to grant the insurer’s request for waiver, the commissioner may consider the type and volume of business written, ownership and organizational structure of the insurer or insurance group, and any other factor the commissioner considers relevant to the insurer or insurance group of which the insurer is a member. If the insurer is part of an insurance group with insurers domiciled in more than one state, the commissioner shall coordinate with the lead state commissioner and with the other domiciliary commissioners in considering whether to grant the insurer’s request for a waiver.

(e) Notwithstanding the exemptions stated in this section, the commissioner may do either one or both of the following:

(1) The commissioner may require that an insurer maintain a risk management framework, conduct an ORSA, and file an ORSA Summary Report based on unique circumstances, which include, but are not limited to, the type and volume of business written, ownership and organizational structure, federal agency requests, and international supervisor requests.

(2) The commissioner may require that an insurer maintain a risk management framework, conduct an ORSA, and file an ORSA Summary Report if the insurer (A) has Risk-Based Capital for a Company Action Level Event as described in Section 739.3, (B) meets one or more of the standards of an insurer that may be determined to be in hazardous financial condition as provided in Article 14.5 (commencing with Section
 1065.1), and in regulations, or (C) otherwise exhibits qualities of a troubled insurer as determined by the commissioner.

(f) If an insurer that qualifies for an exemption pursuant to subdivision (a) subsequently no longer qualifies for that exemption due to changes in premiums as reflected in the insurer’s most recent annual statement or in the most recent annual statements of the insurers within the insurance group of which the insurer is a member, the insurer shall have one year following the year the threshold in subdivision (a) is exceeded to comply with the requirements of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 238, Sec. 1.   (AB 584)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2015, pursuant to Section 935.11.)
-------------------------------------------

935.7.

(a) The ORSA Summary Report shall be prepared consistent with the ORSA Guidance Manual, subject to the requirements of this section. Documentation and supporting information shall be maintained and made available upon examination or upon request of the commissioner.

(b) The commissioner shall review the ORSA Summary Report submitted pursuant to Section 935.5 and any additional requests for information, using procedures similar to those currently used in the analysis and examination of multistate or global insurers and insurance groups.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 238, Sec. 1.   (AB 584)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2015, pursuant to Section 935.11.)
-------------------------------------------

935.8.

(a) Documents, materials, or other information, including the ORSA Summary Report, in the possession of or control of the Department of Insurance that are obtained by, created by, or disclosed to the commissioner or any other person under this article, are recognized by this state as being proprietary and contain trade secrets. These documents, materials, or other information shall be confidential by law and privileged, shall not be subject to disclosure pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), and shall not be subject to subpoena or discovery, or admissible in evidence, in any private civil action. However, the commissioner is authorized to use those
 documents, materials, or other information in the furtherance of any regulatory or legal action brought as a part of the commissioner’s official duties. The commissioner shall not otherwise make those documents, materials, or other information public without the prior written consent of the insurer.

(b) Neither the commissioner nor any other person who received documents, materials, or other ORSA-related information, including the ORSA Summary Report, through examination or otherwise, while acting under the authority of the commissioner, or with whom those documents, materials, or other information are shared pursuant to this article, shall be permitted or required to testify in any private civil action concerning those confidential documents, materials, or information, subject to subdivision (a).

(c) In order to assist in the performance of the commissioner’s regulatory duties, the commissioner:

(1) May, upon request, share documents, materials, or other ORSA-related information, including the confidential and privileged documents, materials, or information subject to subdivision (a), including proprietary and trade secret documents and materials, with other state, federal, and international financial regulatory agencies, including members of any supervisory college as described in Section 1215.7, with the NAIC, and with any third-party consultants designated by the commissioner, provided that the recipient agrees in writing to maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of the ORSA-related documents, materials, or other information and has verified in writing the legal authority to maintain confidentiality.

(2) May receive documents, materials, or other ORSA-related information, including otherwise confidential and privileged documents, materials, or information, including proprietary and trade secret information or documents, from regulatory officials of other foreign or domestic jurisdictions, including members of any supervisory college as described in Section 1215.7, and from the NAIC, and shall maintain as confidential or privileged any documents, materials, or information received with notice or the understanding that it is confidential or privileged under the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the document, material, or information.

(3) Shall enter into a written agreement with the NAIC or a third-party consultant governing the sharing and the use of information
 provided pursuant to this article, consistent with this subdivision that shall do all of the following:

(A) Specify procedures and protocols regarding the confidentiality and security of information shared with the NAIC or a third-party consultant pursuant to this article, including procedures and protocols for sharing by the NAIC with other state regulators from states in which the insurance group has domiciled insurers. The agreement shall provide that the recipient agrees in writing to maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of the ORSA-related documents, materials, or other information and has verified in writing the legal authority to maintain confidentiality.

(B) Specify that ownership of information shared with the NAIC or a third-party consultant pursuant to this
 article remains with the commissioner and that the NAIC’s or a third-party consultant’s use of the information is subject to the direction of the commissioner.

(C) Prohibit the NAIC or third-party consultant from storing the information shared pursuant to this article in a permanent database after the underlying analysis is completed.

(D) Require prompt notice to be given to an insurer whose confidential information in the possession of the NAIC or a third-party consultant pursuant to this article when that information is subject to a request or subpoena to the NAIC or a third-party consultant for disclosure or production.

(E) Require the NAIC or a third-party consultant to consent to intervention by an insurer
 in any judicial or administrative action in which the NAIC or a third-party consultant may be required to disclose confidential information about the insurer shared with the NAIC or a third-party consultant pursuant to this article.

(F) In the case of an agreement involving a third-party consultant, provide for the insurer’s written consent.

(d) The sharing of information and documents by the commissioner pursuant to this article shall not constitute a
 delegation of regulatory authority or rulemaking, and the commissioner is solely responsible for the administration, execution, and enforcement of the provisions of this article.

(e) A waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality in the documents, proprietary and trade secret materials, or other ORSA-related information shall not occur as a result of disclosure of the ORSA-related information or documents to the commissioner under this section or as a result of sharing as authorized in this article.

(f) Documents, materials, or other information in the possession or control of the NAIC or a third-party consultant pursuant to this article shall be confidential by law and privileged, shall not be subject to disclosure pursuant to the California Public
 Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), and shall not be subject to subpoena or discovery, or admissible in evidence, in any private civil action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 302.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

935.9.

Any insurer failing, without just cause, to timely file the ORSA Summary Report as required in this article shall be subject to the late filing fees set forth in Section 924. The commissioner may reduce the penalty if the insurer demonstrates to the commissioner that the imposition of the penalty would constitute a financial hardship to the insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 238, Sec. 1.   (AB 584)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2015, pursuant to Section 935.11.)
-------------------------------------------

935.10.

If any provision of this article, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, that determination shall not affect the provisions or applications of this article that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end the provisions of this article are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 238, Sec. 1.   (AB 584)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2015, pursuant to Section 935.11.)
-------------------------------------------

935.11.

This article shall become operative on January 1, 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 238, Sec. 1.   (AB 584)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date (Jan. 1, 2015) for Article 10.6, commencing with Section 935.1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.8. Corporate Governance Disclosure Act [936.1. - 936.9.]

936.1.

(a) The purpose of this article is to provide the Insurance Commissioner a summary of an insurer or insurance group’s corporate governance structure, policies, and practices to permit the commissioner to gain and maintain an understanding of the insurer’s corporate governance framework and outline the requirements for completing a corporate governance annual disclosure with the Insurance Commissioner. The requirements of this article shall apply to all insurers domiciled in this state.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that the Corporate Governance Annual Disclosure and related information will contain confidential and sensitive information related to an insurer or insurance group’s internal
 operations and proprietary and trade secret information that, if made public, could potentially cause the insurer or insurance group competitive harm or disadvantage.

(c) This article shall not be construed to prescribe or impose corporate governance standards and internal procedures beyond that which is required under applicable state corporate law. Notwithstanding the foregoing, this article shall not be construed to limit the commissioner’s authority or the rights or obligations of third parties, under Article 4 (commencing with Section 729) relating to the examination of insurers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 213, Sec. 1.   (AB 553)   Effective August 17, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

936.2.

For the purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Corporate Governance Annual Disclosure (CGAD)” means a confidential report filed by the insurer or insurance group made in accordance with the requirements of this article.

(b) “Insurance group” means those insurers and affiliates included within an insurance holding company system as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 1215 (Insurance Holding Company System Regulatory Act).

(c) “Insurer” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 1215, except that it shall not include agencies, authorities, or
 instrumentalities of the United States, its possessions and territories, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the District of Columbia, or a state or political subdivision of a state.

(d) An “ORSA Summary Report” means the report filed in accordance with subdivision (e) of Section 935.2.

(e) “Corporate Governance Annual Disclosure Model Regulation” means the current version of the Corporate Governance Annual Disclosure Model Regulation developed and adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners (NAIC) and as amended from time to time. A change in the Corporate Governance Annual Disclosure Model Regulations shall be effective on the January 1 following the calendar year in which the changes have been adopted by the NAIC.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 213, Sec. 1.   (AB 553)   Effective August 17, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

936.3.

(a) An insurer, or the insurance group of which the insurer is a member, shall, no later than June 1 of each calendar year, submit to the commissioner a CGAD that contains the information described in subdivision (b) of Section 936.5. Notwithstanding any request from the commissioner made pursuant to subdivision (c), if the insurer is a member of an insurance group, the insurer shall submit the report required by this section to the commissioner of the lead state for the insurance group, in accordance with the laws of the lead state, as determined by the procedures outlined in the most recent Financial Analysis Handbook adopted by the NAIC.

(b) The CGAD shall include a signature of the insurer or
 insurance group’s chief executive officer or corporate secretary attesting to the best of that individual’s belief and knowledge that the insurer has implemented the corporate governance practices therein and that a copy of the disclosure has been provided to the insurer’s board of directors or the appropriate committee thereof.

(c) An insurer not required to submit a CGAD under this section shall submit a CGAD upon the commissioner’s request.

(d) (1) For purposes of completing the CGAD, the insurer or insurance group may provide information regarding corporate governance at one or all of the following: the ultimate controlling parent level, an intermediate holding company level, or the individual legal entity level, depending upon how the insurer or insurance group has structured its system of corporate governance.

(2) The insurer or insurance group is encouraged to make the CGAD disclosures at one of the following levels:

(A) At the level at which the insurer’s or insurance group’s risk appetite is determined.

(B) At the level at which the earnings, capital, liquidity, operations, and reputation of the insurer are overseen collectively and at which the supervision of those factors are coordinated and exercised.

 (C) At the level at which legal liability for failure of general corporate governance duties would be placed.

(3) If the insurer or insurance group determines the level of reporting based on the criteria listed in paragraph (2), it shall indicate which of the three criteria was used to determine
 the level of reporting and explain any subsequent changes in the level of reporting.

(e) The review of the CGAD and any additional requests for information shall be made through the lead state as determined by the procedures within the most recent Financial Analysis Handbook referenced in subdivision (a).

(f) Insurers providing information substantially similar to the information required by this article in other documents provided to the commissioner, including proxy statements filed in conjunction with Form B requirements, or other state or federal filings provided to the department, shall not be required to duplicate that information in the CGAD but shall only be required to cross reference the document in which the information is included.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 213, Sec. 1.   (AB 553)   Effective August 17, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

936.4.

The commissioner may, upon notice and opportunity for all interested parties to be heard, issue those rules, regulations, and orders as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this article. Those rules and regulations shall be adopted, amended, or repealed in accordance with Administrative Procedure Act Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 213, Sec. 1.   (AB 553)   Effective August 17, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

936.5.

(a) The insurer or insurance group shall have discretion over the responses to the CGAD inquiries, provided the CGAD contains the material information necessary to permit the commissioner to gain an understanding of the insurer's or group's corporate governance structure, policies, and practices. The commissioner may request additional information that he or she deems material and necessary to provide him or her with a clear understanding of the corporate governance policies, the reporting or information system, or controls implementing those policies.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the insurer or insurer group shall prepare the CGAD consistent with the NAIC Corporate Governance Annual Disclosure
 Model Regulation, subject to the requirements of this article. Documentation and supporting information shall be maintained and made available upon examination or upon request of the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 213, Sec. 1.   (AB 553)   Effective August 17, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

936.6.

(a) (1) Documents, materials, or other information, including the CGAD, in the possession or control of the department that are obtained by, created by, or disclosed to, the commissioner or any other person under this article are recognized by this state as being proprietary and to contain trade secrets. All those documents, materials, or other information shall be confidential by law and privileged, shall not be subject to disclosure by the commissioner pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), shall not be subject to subpoena, and shall not be subject to discovery from the commissioner or admissible in evidence in any private
 civil action if obtained from the commissioner in any manner.

(2) However, the commissioner is authorized to use the documents, materials, or other information in the furtherance of any regulatory or legal action brought as a part of the commissioner’s official duties. The commissioner shall not otherwise disclose or make public the documents, materials, or other information without the prior written consent of the insurer.

(3) This section shall not be construed to require written consent of the insurer before the commissioner may share or receive confidential documents, materials, or other CGAD-related information pursuant to subdivision (c) to assist in the performance of the commissioner’s regulatory duties.

(b) Neither the commissioner nor any person who received documents, materials, or other CGAD-related information, through examination or otherwise, while acting under the authority of the commissioner, or with whom those documents, materials, or other information are shared pursuant to this article shall be permitted or required to testify in any private civil action concerning any confidential documents, materials, or information described in subdivision (a).

(c) In order to assist in the performance of the commissioner’s regulatory duties, the commissioner may do both of the following:

(1) Upon request, share documents, materials, or other CGAD-related information, including the confidential and privileged documents, materials, or information described in subdivision
 (a), including proprietary and trade secret documents and materials with other state, federal, and international financial regulatory agencies, including members of any supervisory college as defined in Section 1215.7 (Insurance Holding Company System Regulatory Act), with the NAIC, and with third-party consultants pursuant to Section 936.7, provided that the recipient agrees in writing to maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of the CGAD-related documents, materials, or other information and has verified in writing the legal authority to maintain confidentiality.

(2) Receive documents, materials, or other CGAD-related information, including otherwise confidential and privileged documents, materials, or information, including proprietary and trade-secret information or documents, from regulatory officials of other state,
 federal, and international financial regulatory agencies, including members of any supervisory college as defined in Section 1215.7 (Insurance Holding Company System Regulatory Act), and from the NAIC, and shall maintain as confidential or privileged any documents, materials, or information received with notice or the understanding that it is confidential or privileged under the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the documents, materials, or information.

(d) The sharing of information and documents by the commissioner pursuant to this article shall not constitute a delegation of regulatory authority or rulemaking, and the commissioner is solely responsible for the administration, execution, and enforcement of this article.

(e) No waiver of any applicable privilege or claim
 of confidentiality in the documents, proprietary and trade-secret materials, or other CGAD-related information shall occur as a result of disclosure of that CGAD-related information or those documents to the commissioner under this section or as a result of sharing as authorized in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 303.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

936.7.

(a) The commissioner may retain, at the insurer's expense, third-party consultants, including attorneys, actuaries, accountants, and other experts not otherwise a part of the commissioner’s staff as may be reasonably necessary to assist the commissioner in reviewing the CGAD and related information or the insurer's compliance with this article.

(b) Any person retained under subdivision (a) shall be under the direction and control of the commissioner and shall act in a purely advisory capacity.

(c) The NAIC and third-party consultants shall be subject to the same confidentiality standards and requirements as the commissioner.

(d) As part of the retention process, a third-party consultant shall verify to the commissioner in writing, with notice to the insurer, that it is free of a conflict of interest, and that it has internal procedures in place to monitor compliance with a conflict and to comply with the confidentiality standards and requirements of this article.

(e) A written agreement with the NAIC, a third-party consultant, or both, governing sharing and use of information provided pursuant to this article shall contain all of the following provisions and expressly require the written consent of the insurer prior to making public information provided under this article:

(1) Specific procedures and protocols for maintaining the confidentiality and security of CGAD-related information shared with the NAIC or a third-party consultant
 pursuant to this article.

(2) Procedures and protocols for sharing by the NAIC only with other state regulators from states in which the insurance group has domiciled insurers. The agreement shall provide that the recipient agrees in writing to maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of the CGAD-related documents, materials, or other information and has verified in writing the legal authority to maintain confidentiality.

(3) A provision specifying that ownership of the CGAD-related information shared with the NAIC or a third-party consultant remains with the department, and the NAIC’s or third-party consultant’s use of the information is subject to the direction of the commissioner.

(4) A provision that prohibits the NAIC or a third-party consultant from storing the information shared pursuant to this act
 in a permanent database after the underlying analysis is completed.

(5) A provision requiring the NAIC or third-party consultant to provide prompt notice to the commissioner and to the insurer or insurance group regarding any subpoena, request for disclosure, or request for production of the insurer’s CGAD-related information.

(6) A requirement that the NAIC or a third-party consultant consent to intervention by an insurer in any judicial or administrative action in which the NAIC or a third-party consultant may be required to disclose confidential information about the insurer shared with the NAIC or a third-party consultant pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 213, Sec. 1.   (AB 553)   Effective August 17, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

936.8.

Any insurer or insurer group failing, without just cause, to timely file the CGAD as required in this article shall be subject to the late filing fees set forth in Section 924. The commissioner may reduce the penalty if the insurer or insurer group demonstrates to the commissioner that the imposition of the penalty would constitute a financial hardship to the insurer or insurer group.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 213, Sec. 1.   (AB 553)   Effective August 17, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

936.9.

The provisions of this article, other than Section 936.6, are severable. If any provision of this article, other than Section 936.6, or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 213, Sec. 1.   (AB 553)   Effective August 17, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.85. Insurance and Climate Risk Market Intelligence Act [937. - 937.5.]

937.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Since 2006, the state of California has funded and undertaken four comprehensive climate change assessments designed to assess the impacts and risks from climate change. The most recent, California’s Fourth Climate Change Assessment, identified that if greenhouse gas emissions continue to increase, the frequency of extreme wildfires will increase.

(b) The Department of Insurance’s review of the multistate Climate Risk Disclosure Survey in 2023 showed that insurance companies commonly identified that the purchase of reinsurance is a primary strategy for addressing
 increased risks from catastrophic events such as wildfires and the use of catastrophe modeling is a prominent risk assessment tool. 

(c) It is in the state’s interest to expand insurance options for consumers in wildfire-distressed areas of California. 

(d) It is in the state’s interest to understand the trends in the insurance markets and the reinsurance strategies and models used by insurance companies, not only to expand the writing of insurance policies, but to understand the systemic risk to the solvency of insurance companies that write policies in wildfire-distressed areas. 

(e) Regularly updated information will support the ability of the department to further understand the California residential and commercial
 property insurance market by providing point-in-time information so the department can evaluate reinsurance trends across the market. 

(1) The regularly updated information may include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) The overview of a reinsurance program.

(B) The catastrophe program in place.

(C) The type of risk covered.

(D) The California-specific information.

(E) Year-over-year changes.

(f) Regularly updated data will allow the department to better analyze
 market trends and scenarios, which in turn will result in better, more informed communication to California consumers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 542, Sec. 1.   (SB 495)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

937.1.

(a) (1) On or before March 1, 2026, and on or before March 1 of every year thereafter, an admitted insurer in a group with written premiums in the prior year from fire, allied lines, private flood, homeowners, farmowners, and commercial nonliability lines totaling fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) or more shall submit a report to the commissioner that shall only include data and information necessary to understand its reinsurance program placement data and use of probabilistic catastrophic models for the previous year for policies.

(2) Reports filed on or before March 1, 2026, shall include data from the latest available reinsurance treaty
 year. Subsequent reports shall likewise include data from the latest reinsurance treaty year available when the report is due.

(3) The commissioner may specify the manner of submission, format, and content of the report required pursuant to paragraph (1). 

(b) An insurance holding company system, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 1215, may submit a consolidated report of the information required by this section for all insurers comprising the holding company system. 

(c) Upon submission of a report pursuant to this section, the insurer shall promptly respond to inquiries from the commissioner or their representative regarding the information submitted in the report.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 542, Sec. 1.   (SB 495)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

937.2.

Notwithstanding Section 937.3, information submitted to the commissioner under this article shall be confidential pursuant to Section 7929.000 of the Government Code and exempt from the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code). Additionally, that information shall not be subject to subpoena or subpoena duces tecum. Testimony by the commissioner, the commissioner’s staff, an employee of the department, or a person to whom the report required by Section 937.1 was disclosed, regarding the contents of a report submitted pursuant to Section 937.1, shall be inadmissible as evidence in a civil proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 542, Sec. 1.   (SB 495)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

937.3.

(a) The commissioner shall post to the department’s internet website an aggregated report based on the data collected under Section 937.1.

(b) The report shall include only data and indices aggregated sufficiently to avoid identification of individual company reinsurance practices. 

(c) The aggregated report shall not identify an individual respondent or insurer and may be updated every year to reflect new data submitted by admitted insurers under Section 937.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 542, Sec. 1.   (SB 495)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

937.4.

(a) Failure to submit a report under Section 937.1 shall subject an admitted insurer to a civil penalty to be fixed by the commissioner, not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each 30-day period that the insurer is not in compliance, unless the failure to comply is willful, in which case the civil penalty shall be in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each 30-day period that the insurer is not in compliance, but not to exceed an aggregate amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). The commissioner shall collect the amount payable and may bring an action in the name of the people of the State of California to enforce collection. These penalties shall be in addition to other penalties
 provided by law. 

(b) An insurer may request, and the commissioner may grant, a 30-day extension to submit a report pursuant to Section 937.1 if needed due to unintended or unforeseen delays. If the insurer fails to submit a report pursuant to Section 937.1 after the granted 30-day extension has passed, the commissioner may find that the failure to submit the report was willful and increase the civil penalty to an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each 30-day period that the insurer is not in compliance, but not to exceed an aggregate amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). 

(c) The penalty imposed by this section may be appealed by means of a remedy provided by Section 12940, or by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division
 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) The commissioner may consider an insurer’s violation of this section or article as the basis for other enforcement action against an insurer, as authorized by law.
